Hawaii, session 2025, GM1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 302L-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
3 "(e) [Stipend] Beginning on July 1, 2023, stipend funds
4 repaid by a stipend recipient pursuant to subsection (d) shall
5 be deposited into [Hawaii early- childhood oducator] the early
6 learning special fund established pursuant to section 4r0-!-]
7 3021^2^"
8 SECTION 2. Section 302L-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
9 repealed.
10 ----Hawaii—eaiiy—eliiidho©d—eduea%o3?--3peoia±—#andnr^
11 There-is-established within the state treasury the Hawaii early
12 childhood educa-ter special fund,—fe-o be admini-stcred by the
13 office-?—into which shall be d-eposited all moneys ree-eived by the
14 ef-fiee—seetioft——Moneys in the fund shall
15 bo used for the Hawaii early childhood -educator- stipend program
16 established pursuant to section-302L-9."]
2025-2135 HB1065 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO. g’;
1 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
2 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
3 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2135 HB1065 SDl SMA.docx 2

1065
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
APPROVED this 15th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1065, HD 1,SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 21, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1065, H.D. 1,S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
1772